Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3711
Attorney General; powers and duties.

(1) The Attorney General shall establish a process by which any person may submit information or concerns to the Attorney General regarding real estate transactions in Nebraska.

(2) The Attorney General may submit a report concerning real estate transactions that the Attorney General has identified in Nebraska to the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States.

(3) The Attorney General shall (a) retain a copy of any documents submitted to the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States that are included with any report submitted under subsection (2) of this section and (b) notify the Legislature and the Governor as soon as practicable after submitting such report and included documents to the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 14.